Utah statutes.
55-5-5.   State policy -- Construction of provisions.

It is the policy of this state to provide maximum opportunities for training blind or visually impaired persons, helping them to become self-supporting and demonstrating their capabilities. This act shall be construed to carry out this policy.



Amended by Chapter 73, 2001 General Session

